Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-72] Refusal to appear or testify.
Any person not subject to this chapter who:

(1) Has been duly subpoenaed to appear as a witness
or to produce books and records before a military court or before any military
or civil officer designated to take a deposition to be read in evidence before
such a court;

(2) Has been duly paid or tendered the fees and
mileage of a witness at the rates allowed to witnesses attending the circuit
court; and

(3) Wilfully neglects or refuses to appear, or
refuses to qualify as a witness or to testify or to produce any evidence which
that person may have been legally subpoenaed to produce;

is guilty of an offense against the State and a
military court may punish the person in the same manner as the civil courts of
the State. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next